test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-skuuiper_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - skuuiper: # 2B
    skuuiper+N+Sg+Nom: skuuiper
    skuuiper+N+Sg+Gen: skuipper
    skuuiper+N+Sg+Acc: skuipper
    skuuiper+N+Sg+Ill: skuiperân
    skuuiper+N+Sg+Loc: skuiperist
    skuuiper+N+Sg+Com: skuiperáin
    skuuiper+N+Sg+Abe: skuipperttáá
    skuuiper+N+Ess:    skuiperin
    skuuiper+N+Par:    skuiperid
    skuuiper+N+Pl+Nom: skuipereh
    skuuiper+N+Pl+Gen: skuiperij
    skuuiper+N+Pl+Acc: skuiperijd
    skuuiper+N+Pl+Ill: skuiperáid
    skuuiper+N+Pl+Loc: skuiperijn
    skuuiper+N+Pl+Com: skuiperijguin
    skuuiper+N+Pl+Abe: skuiperijttáá
   
